Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-308.01
Disability, defined.

Disability has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 12102, as such section existed on January 1, 2021.

Disability shall not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled substance as defined in section 28-401.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 20-313;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 17.